Illinois, session 104th, SB3193.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 10-9 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/10-9)7    Sec. 10-9. Trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, 8and related offenses.9    (a) Definitions. In this Section:10    (1) "Intimidation" has the meaning prescribed in Section 1112-6.12    (2) "Commercial sexual activity" means any sex act on 13account of which anything of value is given, promised to, or 14received by any person. 15    (2.5) "Company" means any sole proprietorship, 16organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 17venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 18limited liability limited partnership, limited liability 19company, or other entity or business association, including 20all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, 21parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business 22associations, that exist for the purpose of making profit. 23    (3) "Financial harm" includes intimidation that brings   SB3193- 2 -LRB104 18979 RLC 32424 b1about financial loss, criminal usury, or employment contracts 2that violate the Frauds Act.3    (4) (Blank).4    (5) "Labor" means work of economic or financial value.5    (6) "Maintain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 6secure continued performance thereof, regardless of any 7initial agreement on the part of the victim to perform that 8type of service.9    (7) "Obtain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 10secure performance thereof.11    (7.5) "Serious harm" means any harm, whether physical or 12nonphysical, including psychological, financial, or 13reputational harm, that is sufficiently serious, under all the 14surrounding circumstances, to compel a reasonable person of 15the same background and in the same circumstances to perform 16or to continue performing labor or services in order to avoid 17incurring that harm. 18    (8) "Services" means activities resulting from a 19relationship between a person and the actor in which the 20person performs activities under the supervision of or for the 21benefit of the actor. Commercial sexual activity and 22sexually-explicit performances are forms of activities that 23are "services" under this Section. Nothing in this definition 24may be construed to legitimize or legalize prostitution.25    (9) "Sexually-explicit performance" means a live, 26recorded, broadcast (including over the Internet), or public   SB3193- 3 -LRB104 18979 RLC 32424 b1act or show intended to arouse or satisfy the sexual desires or 2appeal to the prurient interests of patrons.3    (10) "Trafficking victim" means a person subjected to the 4practices set forth in subsection (b), (c), or (d).5    (b) Involuntary servitude. A person commits involuntary 6servitude when he or she knowingly subjects, attempts to 7subject, or engages in a conspiracy to subject another person 8to labor or services obtained or maintained through any of the 9following means, or any combination of these means: 10        (1) causes or threatens to cause physical harm to any 11    person;12        (2) physically restrains or threatens to physically 13    restrain another person;14        (3) abuses or threatens to abuse the law or legal 15    process;16        (4) attempts to or knowingly destroys, conceals, 17    removes, confiscates, or possesses any actual or purported 18    passport or other immigration document, or any other 19    actual or purported government identification document, of 20    another person;21        (5) uses intimidation, abuses a position of trust, 22    authority, or supervision in relation to the victim, 23    through the use or deprivation of any alcoholic 24    intoxicant, a drug as defined or used in the Illinois 25    Controlled Substances Act or the Cannabis Control Act, or 26    methamphetamine as defined in the Methamphetamine Control   SB3193- 4 -LRB104 18979 RLC 32424 b1    and Community Protection Act, or exerts financial control 2    over any person; or3        (6) uses any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to 4    cause the person to believe that, if the person did not 5    perform the labor or services, that person or another 6    person would suffer serious harm or physical restraint. 7    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 8or (f), a violation of subsection (b)(1) is a Class X felony 9for which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 10imprisonment of not less than 9 years and not exceeding 45 11years, (b)(2) is a Class X 1 felony, (b)(3) is a Class 1 2 12felony, (b)(4) is a Class 2 3 felony, (b)(5) and (b)(6) is a 13Class 3 4 felony. 14    (c) Involuntary sexual servitude of a minor. A person 15commits involuntary sexual servitude of a minor when he or she 16knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or 17obtains by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, 18provide, or obtain by any means, another person under 18 years 19of age, knowing that the minor will engage in commercial 20sexual activity, a sexually-explicit performance, or the 21production of pornography, or causes or attempts to cause a 22minor to engage in one or more of those activities and:23        (1) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 24    between the ages of 17 and 18 years;25        (2) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 26    under the age of 17 years; or  SB3193- 5 -LRB104 18979 RLC 32424 b1        (3) there is overt force or threat.2    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 3or (f), a violation of subsection (c)(1) is a Class X 1 felony, 4(c)(2) is a Class X felony for which the person shall be 5sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than 9 years 6and not exceeding 45 years, and (c)(3) is a Class X felony for 7which the person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment 8of not less than 9 years and not exceeding 45 years. 9    (d) Trafficking in persons. A person commits trafficking 10in persons when he or she knowingly: (1) recruits, entices, 11harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, or 12attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or 13obtain by any means, another person, intending or knowing that 14the person will be subjected to involuntary servitude; or (2) 15benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from 16participation in a venture that has engaged in an act of 17involuntary servitude or involuntary sexual servitude of a 18minor. A company commits trafficking in persons when the 19company knowingly benefits, financially or by receiving 20anything of value, from participation in a venture that has 21engaged in an act of involuntary servitude or involuntary 22sexual servitude of a minor.23    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 24or (f), a violation of this subsection by a person is a Class X 251 felony. A violation of this subsection by a company is a 26business offense for which a fine of up to $100,000 may be   SB3193- 6 -LRB104 18979 RLC 32424 b1imposed.2    (e) Aggravating factors. A violation of this Section 3involving kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, aggravated 4criminal sexual assault or an attempt to commit aggravated 5criminal sexual assault, or an attempt to commit first degree 6murder is a Class X felony for which the person shall be 7sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than 9 years 8and not exceeding 45 years. 9    (f) Sentencing considerations.10        (1) Bodily injury. If, pursuant to a violation of this 11    Section, a victim suffered bodily injury, the defendant 12    may be sentenced to an extended-term sentence under 13    Section 5-8-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections. The 14    sentencing court must take into account the time in which 15    the victim was held in servitude, with increased penalties 16    for cases in which the victim was held for between 180 days 17    and one year, and increased penalties for cases in which 18    the victim was held for more than one year.19        (2) Number of victims. In determining sentences within 20    statutory maximums, the sentencing court should take into 21    account the number of victims, and may provide for 22    substantially increased sentences in cases involving more 23    than 10 victims.24        (3) Age of victim. In determining sentences, the 25    sentencing court shall take into account the age of the 26    victim or victims.   SB3193- 7 -LRB104 18979 RLC 32424 b1    (g) Restitution. Restitution is mandatory under this 2Section. In addition to any other amount of loss identified, 3the court shall order restitution including the greater of (1) 4the gross income or value to the defendant of the victim's 5labor or services or (2) the value of the victim's labor as 6guaranteed under the Minimum Wage Law and overtime provisions 7of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) or the Minimum Wage Law, 8whichever is greater.9    (g-5) Fine distribution. If the court imposes a fine under 10subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section, it shall be 11collected and distributed to the Specialized Services for 12Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund in accordance with Section 135-9-1.21 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 14    (h) Trafficking victim services. Subject to the 15availability of funds, the Department of Human Services may 16provide or fund emergency services and assistance to 17individuals who are victims of one or more offenses defined in 18this Section. 19    (i) Certification. The Attorney General, a State's 20Attorney, or any law enforcement official shall certify in 21writing to the United States Department of Justice or other 22federal agency, such as the United States Department of 23Homeland Security, that an investigation or prosecution under 24this Section has begun and the individual who is a likely 25victim of a crime described in this Section is willing to 26cooperate or is cooperating with the investigation to enable   SB3193- 8 -LRB104 18979 RLC 32424 b1the individual, if eligible under federal law, to qualify for 2an appropriate special immigrant visa and to access available 3federal benefits. Cooperation with law enforcement shall not 4be required of victims of a crime described in this Section who 5are under 18 years of age. This certification shall be made 6available to the victim and his or her designated legal 7representative. 8    (j) A person who commits involuntary servitude, 9involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 10persons under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section is 11subject to the property forfeiture provisions set forth in 12Article 124B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 13(Source: P.A. 104-159, eff. 1-1-26.)